Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB369.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "land bank jurisdiction" and "municipality" in section 2103 of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Land bank jurisdiction."(1) a [county, a city, a borough, a township and an incorporated town with a population of more than 10,000] municipality; or1234567891011121314151617 (2) two or more municipalities [with populations less than 10,000] that enter into an intergovernmental cooperation agreement to establish and maintain a land bank.* * *"Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township [or], home rule municipality, optional plan municipality or optional charter municipality.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0369PN0325 - 2 - 123456789